inc/verb_outer_affixes.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@
@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@
@U.OUTERPREFIX.ON@

LEXICON Root

@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@@U.OUTERPREFIX.ON@dà  #;
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                       #;

@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@@U.OUTERPREFIX.ON@dà    #;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                         #;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@@U.OUTERPREFIX.ON@dà     #;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@                          #;
                                                                   #;
